District of Columbia, session 26, B26-0029.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE COUNCIL OF THE DISTRICT OF COLUMBIA, That this
act may be cited as the “Institution of Higher Education Sexual Misconduct Reporting and
Resource Accessibility Act of 2025”.
Sec. 2. Definitions.
For the purposes of this act, the term:
(1) “Assisted party” means a student at, or an employee of, an institution who
seeks the services of a confidential resource advisor.
(2) “Confidential communication” means oral or written information exchanged
between a confidential resource advisor and an assisted party while the confidential resource
advisor is performing the duties required or authorized under this act.
(3) “Confidential resource advisor” means an individual whom an institution has
designated to provide emergency and ongoing support to an assisted party pursuant to section 3
1

ENROLLED ORIGINAL
and who is not empowered to institute corrective measures on behalf of the institution in
response to a report of sexual misconduct.
(4) “Employee” means an individual employed by an institution.
(5) “Institution” means an entity or person incorporated, chartered, or established
in the District, including by Council or congressional act, that offers postsecondary or graduate
degrees, and that operates, keeps, or maintains a facility in the District.
(6) “Student” means an individual who is enrolled at an institution at the time of
alleged sexual misconduct.
(7) “Sexual misconduct” shall have the same meaning as sex-based harassment, as
that term is defined in 34 C.F.R. § 106.2;
(8) “Sexual misconduct resource provider” means a:
(A) Domestic violence counselor, as that term is defined in D.C. Official
Code § 14-310(a)(2);
(B) Human trafficking counselor, as that term is defined in D.C. Official
Code § 14-311(a)(2); or
(C) Sexual assault counselor, as that term is defined in D.C. Official Code
§ 23-1907(10).
(9) “Supportive measures” shall have the same meaning as provided in 34 C.F.R.
§ 106.2.
(10) “Title IX” means Title IX of the Education Amendments of 1972, approved
June 23, 1972 (86 Stat. 373; 20 U.S.C. § 1681 et seq.).
(11) “Title IX Coordinator” means the employee designated by an institution to
perform the functions required by 34 C.F.R. § 106.8(a).
(12) “Trauma-informed response” means a response to a report of sexual
misconduct involving an understanding of the complexities of sexual misconduct through
training centered on the neurobiological impact of trauma, the influence of myths and stereotypes
surrounding the causes and impacts of trauma, perpetration methodology pertaining to sexual
misconduct, and methods to conduct investigations of sexual misconduct.
Sec. 3. Confidential resource advisor role and responsibilities.
(a)(1) Each institution shall employ or contract for at least 2 confidential resource
advisors to serve as confidential resources for students and employees seeking resources
pertaining to sexual misconduct.
(2) An institution shall notify all students and employees, in writing, of the
identities, contact information for, and availability of its confidential resource advisors.
(b) Confidential resource advisors shall provide all institution students and employees
with resources related to sexual misconduct in written or electronic format, which may include
website links, pamphlets, handouts, and information packets. An institution may authorize its
2

ENROLLED ORIGINAL
Title IX Coordinator to approve the resources to be provided by confidential resource providers
before dissemination to ensure accuracy and institutional consistency.
(c) Confidential resource advisors may provide resources and information to assisted
parties in addition to those provided pursuant to subsection (b) of this section, including:
(1) Options for reporting sexual misconduct to the institution’s public safety
personnel, District or federal law enforcement, or the institution’s Title IX Coordinator, and the
processes required for making a complaint to each entity;
(2) Information pertaining to free and low-cost legal and sexual misconduct
response services available through local legal services providers, sexual misconduct resource
providers, and the District’s Crime Victim Compensation Program;
(3) Information pertaining to securing protection or no contact orders, restraining
orders, or similar lawful orders issued by a criminal or civil court;
(4) Information pertaining to the assisted party’s rights and the institution’s
responsibilities regarding protection orders, no contact orders, and any other lawful orders issued
by the institution or by a court of law;
(5) The investigative processes of District and federal law enforcement agencies
and legal processes of District judicial bodies pertaining to sexual misconduct;
(6) Medical and health services available through the institution and at facilities
that are unaffiliated with the institution, including free medical forensic exams available through
local sexual assault nurse examiner programs;
(7) Counseling and mental health services available through the institution and
available through local providers outside the institution;
(8) For students considering changes in their enrollment status such that the
housing arrangements, healthcare, or insurance coverage available through the institution would
be disrupted or terminated, rent assistance resources, healthcare resources, and insurance
resources available outside the institution;
(9) The formal and informal resolution processes pertaining to sexual misconduct
available at the institution and available outside the institution through sexual misconduct
resource providers;
(10) A description of the supportive measures available at the institution,
including through the institution’s Title IX office and disabilities services office;
(11) Information about the Title IX Coordinator’s role in providing students with
supportive measures and in assisting students with maintaining academic progress, such as
withdrawing from or taking an incomplete grade in a class; and
(12) For students considering changes in their enrollment status, referrals to loan
counseling services pertaining to loan deferment, loan default, forbearance, or other student loan
or grant programs.
(d) Confidential resource advisors shall inform assisted parties of limitations in providing
privacy or confidentiality, including informing the assisted party that information shared with the
3

ENROLLED ORIGINAL
confidential resource advisor could be disclosed in limited circumstances, including in response
to a court order or subpoena.
(e) The confidential resource advisor may provide guidance to the assisted party
regarding how to access supportive measures and in deciding the type of supportive measures to
request.
(f) Within 3 months after being designated as a confidential resource advisor, in
coordination with the institution’s Title IX Coordinator, a confidential resource advisor shall
establish and maintain regular communication with the federally designated state sexual assault
coalition for the District and the federally recognized statewide coalition of domestic violence
programs for the District.
(g) A confidential resource advisor may, if appropriate and if directed by the assisted
party, support the assisted party in contacting the institution’s public safety personnel or local or
federal law enforcement to make a report of sexual misconduct.
(h) A confidential resource advisor may attend an administrative or institution-based
adjudication proceeding as the advisor for the assisted party.
(i)(1) Notwithstanding section 2 of An Act To provide for the mandatory reporting by
physicians and institutions in the District of Columbia of certain physical abuse of children,
approved November 6, 1966 (80 Stat. 1354; D.C. Official Code § 4-1321.02), when an
individual is acting in the individual’s capacity as a confidential resource advisor, an assisted
party’s communications with the confidential resource advisor relating to an incident of sexual
misconduct shall be confidential, may not be disclosed to the institution or law enforcement
authorities, and shall be privileged against disclosure in any legal or administrative proceeding
unless:
(A) Disclosure of information is necessary for the institution to comply
with section 485(f) of the Higher Education Act of 1965, approved October 17, 1986 (104 Stat.
1454; 20 U.S.C § 1092(f));
(B) A party admits to committing what the confidential resource advisor
reasonably believes to be a crime of violence, as the term is defined in D.C. Official Code § 23-
1331(4), or a dangerous crime, as the term is defined in D.C. Official Code § 23-1331(3);
(C) The confidential resource advisor deems disclosure necessary to
protect the assisted party or another individual from a substantial risk of imminent and serious
injury;
(D) The party the confidential resource advisor assisted provided written
consent for the confidential resource advisor to disclose information the confidential resource
advisor received from the party; or
(E) Disclosure is otherwise required by a District or federal statute or by a
court of law.
(2) To the extent the disclosure of information covered in paragraph (1) of this
subsection would not be permitted under the Family Educational Rights and Privacy Act of
4

ENROLLED ORIGINAL
1974, approved August 21, 1974 (88 Stat. 571; 20 U.S.C. § 1232g et seq.), and its implementing
regulations (34 C.F.R Part 99), the exceptions to confidentiality in paragraph (1) of this
subsection shall not apply.
(j)(1) If a confidential resource advisor is required by statute or by a court of law to
disclose a confidential communication, the confidential resource advisor shall inform the student
or employee who made the confidential communication of the requirement to disclose at least 7
calendar days in advance of disclosure, unless prohibited by law, a court order, or subpoena from
disclosing the requirement to disclose information.
(2) If the assisted party notifies the confidential resource provider that the
individual has filed a motion for a protective order or a motion to quash prior to the date
disclosure is due, the confidential resource provider shall not disclose the required information
until there is a ruling by the court on such motion and shall only make the disclosure as
determined by the court.
(k)(1) An institution may contract with a victim advocacy organization to provide
confidential resource advisors as required under this section.
(2) An institution that enrolls fewer than 1,000 residential students may partner
with another institution or sexual misconduct resource provider in the District to provide the
services required under this section.
(3) An institution shall ensure that any contract entered into under this subsection
shall result in a confidential resource advisor being available within a reasonable distance from
the institution or by electronic means.
(l) Notice to a confidential resource advisor of an alleged act of sexual misconduct or a
confidential resource advisor's performance of a service under this section shall not be
considered actual or constructive notice of an allegation of sexual misconduct to the institution at
which a confidential resource advisor is employed or provides contracted services.
(m) The Metropolitan Police Department or the institution shall not discipline, penalize,
or otherwise retaliate against a confidential resource advisor for lawful actions taken in the
course of representing the interests of the assisted party.
(n) The services provided to assisted parties by a confidential resource advisor shall be
free of charge.
Sec. 4. Confidential resource advisor qualifications and training.
(a) A confidential resource advisor:
(1) Shall:
(A) Have undergone training that conforms with the requirements of D.C.
Official Code § 23-1907(10)(B);
(B) Be appointed based on the individual’s professional experience and
training to provide support to students and employees;
(C) Complete yearly trainings in:
5

ENROLLED ORIGINAL
(i) Sexual misconduct awareness and prevention;
(ii) Title IX policies pertaining to sexual misconduct;
(iii) Trauma-informed responses;
(iv) District laws pertaining to sexual misconduct survivor rights
and resources; and
(v) If employed by an institution, the institution’s policies
pertaining to student conduct, sexual misconduct, and sexual relationships;
(2) Shall not:
(A) Provide mental health or behavioral health counseling services or
therapy to the assisted party while providing confidential advisor services;
(B) Provide services to parties involved in the same allegation of sexual
misconduct;
(C) At the institution that has designated the individual as a confidential
resource advisor be:
(i) An undergraduate student, except for a faculty or staff member
enrolled in one undergraduate course for a term; or
(ii) A full-time graduate or doctoral student;
(D) Be the Title IX Coordinator;
(E) Be an authorized administrator of disciplinary processes on behalf of
the institution;
(F) Be a member of the institution’s public safety personnel; or
(G) Have employment responsibilities that may create a conflict of interest
between the duties of a confidential resource advisor and the employee’s other job
responsibilities, including employment by the institution as:
(i) General counsel;
(ii) A religious or spiritual authority;
(iii) Director of athletics;
(iv) Dean of students; or
(v) An employee who serves on a student or employee conduct
judicial or hearing board or to whom an appeal might be made; and
(3) May be a social worker, psychologist, psychotherapist, professional clinical
counselor, psychiatrist, or mental health counselor licensed in the District; provided, that if a
confidential resource advisor is actively serving the assisted party as a mental or behavioral
health counselor or therapist at the time the assisted party seeks confidential resource advisor
services, the confidential resource advisor cannot serve the assisted party in both capacities.
Sec. 5. Amnesty protections.
(a) A student or a witness to an incident of sexual misconduct who reports an incident of
sexual misconduct to an institution or to local or federal law enforcement shall not be subject to a
6

ENROLLED ORIGINAL
disciplinary proceeding or sanction for a violation of the institution's policies governing students
or the student code of conduct for voluntary use or possession of illegal drugs or alcohol or for
consensual sexual activity that occurred immediately preceding, during, or immediately
following the incident of sexual misconduct unless the institution determines that the report was
not made in good faith or that the violation put at immediate risk the health and safety of other
individuals.
(b) Notwithstanding an institution’s policies governing students or a student code of
conduct, an institution shall not take disciplinary action against any student for consensual sexual
activity related to an incident or allegation of sexual misconduct or for other consensual sexual
activity revealed during an investigation of a report of sexual misconduct.
(c) This section shall not apply to an institution if the application would be inconsistent
with a sincerely held religious belief of the institution.
Sec. 6. Sexual misconduct awareness and prevention trainings.
(a) An institution that provides undergraduate education shall make reasonable efforts to
require every undergraduate student to complete 2 sexual misconduct primary prevention and
awareness trainings that are trauma-informed and gender-inclusive, one of which shall occur
before the beginning of the 2nd year of a student’s undergraduate education, and the 2nd before
the beginning of the 4th year of a student’s undergraduate education; provided that an institution
will be deemed to have complied with this section if a student enrolled in a 2-year degree
program receives one training before the beginning of the student’s 2nd year. The training shall
include:
(1) An explanation of consent in reference to sexual activity and sexual
relationships;
(2) Examples of physical and mental incapacitation, such as when an individual is
asleep, unresponsive, unconscious, vomiting, unable to walk unassisted or dress or undress
without assistance, incoherently communicating, or displaying a lack of awareness;
(3) The role that drugs and alcohol play in an individual's ability to consent;
(4) Information in writing about:
(A) The importance of preserving evidence to document sexual
misconduct;
(B) Procedures to report an incident of sexual misconduct, including
confidential and anonymous disclosure, and a statement that the institution’s ability to respond to
confidential or anonymous disclosure may be limited; and
(C) Information on the institution's procedures for resolving sexual
misconduct complaints, including informal resolution options, and the range of sanctions the
institution may impose on students and employees found responsible for sexual misconduct;
(5) The name and contact information of the institution’s confidential resource
advisors and the limitations of the confidentiality of this role;
7

ENROLLED ORIGINAL
(6) Safe and positive strategies for bystander intervention that may be carried out
by an individual to prevent harm or reduce risk of sexual misconduct;
(7) The institution’s responsibilities regarding orders of protection, no contact
orders, restraining orders, or similar orders issued by a criminal or civil court;
(8) Opportunities for ongoing sexual misconduct prevention and sexual
misconduct awareness training and programming; and
(9) A list of off-campus sexual misconduct resource providers, updated annually
by the institution in consultation with the District’s federally designated state sexual assault
coalition and federally recognized statewide coalition of domestic violence programs.
(b) Institutions shall ensure that sexual misconduct prevention materials such as
handouts, posters, website links, and information packets are prominently displayed and readily
available to students and staff in all institution buildings where students are permitted, including
in dormitories, academic buildings, office buildings, libraries, athletic facilities, laboratories,
student centers, and dining halls.
Sec. 7. Training for individuals involved in sexual misconduct response processes.
(a) An individual who participates in the implementation of an institution's sexual
misconduct investigative and disciplinary processes shall receive annual training in handling
sexual misconduct complaints and in the operations of the institution's disciplinary process,
which shall include:
(1) Information about working with and interviewing individuals involved in an
allegation of sexual misconduct;
(2) Information about types of conduct that constitute sexual misconduct;
(3) Information about consent and the role drugs and alcohol may play in an
individual's ability to consent;
(4) The effects of trauma, including neurobiological and physical manifestations
of trauma in an individual;
(5) How to avoid making assumptions about culpability based on protected
categories and social identities; and
(6) Techniques to communicate sensitively and compassionately with individuals
involved in an allegation of sexual misconduct.
(b) An institution shall ensure that its confidential resource advisor, Title IX office
personnel, and public safety personnel employed or contracted by the institution are educated in
trauma-informed responses.
Sec. 8. Minimum criteria for institutional sexual misconduct policies.
(a) An institution shall ensure that the institution’s sexual misconduct policy includes:
(1) Information on where victims of sexual misconduct can receive immediate
emergency assistance following an incident of sexual misconduct, which shall include:
8

ENROLLED ORIGINAL
(A) The name, location, and contact information of medical facilities
where an individual may request that a medical forensic exam be administered by a trained
sexual assault forensic health care provider;
(B) Descriptions and contact information for sexual misconduct resource
providers and a description of the services provided by such providers;
(C) The telephone number and website for a national and local 24-hour
sexual misconduct response hotline; and
(D) Information on any programs that may provide financial assistance to
a student with the cost of emergency medical assistance or related travel; and
(2) Information regarding the legal and institutional obligations of the Title IX
Coordinator and employees of the Title IX office; and
(3) Descriptions of the roles and responsibilities and contact information for the
institution’s confidential resource advisors and Title IX Coordinator.
(b) Each institution shall distribute the information required under subsection (a) of this
section by electronic or postal mail to students and employees of the institution or shall maintain
the information on its website.
Sec. 9. Data reporting requirements.
(a) Beginning on June 30, 2029, and every 3rd calendar year thereafter, institutions shall
prepare and submit to the Higher Education Licensure Commission and publish on the
institution’s website a report with data about confidential resource advisor and Title IX office
outcomes for the previous 3 calendar years. The report shall not include personal identifying
information of students or staff who accessed the institution’s sexual misconduct resources or
any information that by itself or in combination with other publicly available information could
identify a particular person. Demographic data may be aggregated, and any counts or data points
with fewer than 10 reports shall be suppressed. The report shall include:
(1) For the institution’s Title IX office:
(A) Sexual misconduct reports to the institution’s Title IX office by
academic term for each academic year, broken down by dating violence, domestic violence,
stalking, sexual assault, and sexual harassment;
(B) Sexual misconduct complaints to the institution’s Title IX office by
academic term for each academic year, broken down by dating violence, domestic violence,
stalking, sexual assault, and sexual harassment;
(C) The location of a reported incident of sexual misconduct;
(D) The complainant’s status as a student or employee of the institution;
(E) The source of a report, such as a designated reporter or a complainant;
(F) The number of complainants who requested supportive measures;
(G) The number of complainants who received supportive measures;
9

ENROLLED ORIGINAL
(H) The number of complainants that did not respond to outreach
undertaken by the Title IX office;
(I) The number of complainants that met with a Title IX Coordinator but
did not request supportive measures;
(J) The number of complainants that pursued formal resolution and the
number that pursued alternative resolution;
(K) The number of complaints dismissed;
(L) The number of complaints that resulted in a finding in favor of the
complainant;
(M) The number of non-Title IX related reports referred by the Title IX
office to the institution office that oversees student conduct standards;
(N) The number of reports to which the institution's Title IX office could
not respond because of insufficient information; and
(O) The number of anonymous reports; and
(2) For confidential resource advisors:
(A) The names and titles of confidential resource advisors employed by
the institution during the reporting period, including additional roles or employment
simultaneously held at the institution, or, if the positions are contracted or shared with another
institution, the name of the organization or partner institution providing confidential resource
advisor services for the institution;
(B) The number of times confidential communications were disclosed
pursuant to section 3(i), and the reason for disclosure;
(C) A list of the trainings that the institution’s confidential resource
advisors underwent each year, as required by section 4(a) and section 7;
(D) A description of communications with the federally designated state
sexual assault coalition for the District and the federally recognized statewide coalition of
domestic violence programs for the District required by section 3(f);
(E) The number of individuals that accessed the institution’s confidential
resource advisors; and
(F) The number of individuals that were referred to the institution’s Title
IX office or the institution’s disability services office to receive supportive measures or to file a
complaint.
(b) Institutions may provide additional narrative information in the reports, which may
include trend analysis, explanations that provide context to raw data, and descriptions of the
institution’s sexual misconduct response processes.
(c) Beginning in the calendar year after the online survey for campus safety is first
administered pursuant to section 1507 of the Keeping Children Safe From Family Violence Act,
approved March 15, 2022 (136 Stat. 959; 20 U.S.C. § 1161l-6), institutions in the District shall
10

ENROLLED ORIGINAL
submit the results of the online survey for campus safety to the Higher Education Licensure
Commission and publish the results on the institution’s website.
Sec. 10. Enforcement.
Upon determination, after reasonable notice and opportunity for a hearing, that an institution has
materially violated or failed to carry out any provision of this act, the Higher Education
Licensure Commission may impose a civil fine upon an institution for each violation not to
exceed $59,000, or one percent of an institution’s annual operating budget, whichever is lower.
Revenues generated from collecting civil penalty fines shall be directed to the Office of Victims
Services and Justice Grants to allocate to sexual misconduct resource providers.
Sec. 11. Section 14-307(b) of the District of Columbia Official Code is amended as
follows:
(a) Paragraph (7) is amended by striking the phrase “; and” and inserting a semicolon in
its place.
(b) Paragraph (8) is amended by striking the period and inserting the phrase “; and” in its
place.
(c) A new paragraph (9) is added to read as follows:
“(9) Confidential resource advisors, as that term is defined in the Institution of
Higher Education Sexual Misconduct Reporting and Resource Accessibility Act of 2025, passed
on 2nd reading on April 1, 2025 (Enrolled version of Bill 26-29).”.
Sec. 12. Applicability.
(a) This act shall apply as of June 30, 2026.
(b)(1) Notwithstanding subsection (a) of this section, this act shall apply to the University
of the District of Columbia on the date of inclusion of its fiscal effect on the University of the
District of Columbia in an approved budget and financial plan or as of June 30, 2026, whichever
is later.
(2) The Chief Financial Officer shall certify the date of the inclusion of the fiscal
effect in an approved budget and financial plan, and provide notice to the Budget Director of the
Council of the certification.
(3)(A) The Budget Director shall cause the notice of the certification to be
published in the District of Columbia Register.
(B) The date of publication of the notice of the certification shall not affect
the applicability of this act to the University of the District of Columbia.
Sec. 13. Fiscal impact statement.
11

ENROLLED ORIGINAL
The Council adopts the fiscal impact statement in the committee report as the fiscal
impact statement required by section 4a of the General Legislative Procedures Act of 1975,
approved October 16, 2006 (120 Stat. 2038; D.C. Official Code § 1-301.47a).
Sec. 14. Effective date.
This act shall take effect following approval by the Mayor (or in the event of veto by the
Mayor, action by the Council to override the veto) and a 30-day period of congressional review
as provided in section 602(c)(1) of the District of Columbia Home Rule Act, approved December
24, 1973 (87 Stat. 813: D.C. Official Code § 1-206.02(c)(1)).
___________________________________
Chairman
Council of the District of Columbia
_________________________________
Mayor
District of Columbia
12